California statutes. Civil Code
(5) Guidance on how to report human trafficking, including, but not limited to, national hotlines (1-888-373-7888 and text line 233733) and contact information for local law enforcement agencies that an employee may use to make a confidential report.

(6) Protocols for reporting human trafficking when on the job.

(g) (1) The human trafficking employee training pursuant to subdivision (e) may include, but shall not be limited to, information and material utilized in training Santa Clara County Valley Transportation Authority employees, private nonprofit organizations that represent the interests of human trafficking victims, and the Department of Justice.

(2) The failure to report human trafficking by an employee
 shall not, by itself, result in the liability of the business or other establishment that operates a facility described in paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (a) or of any other person or entity.

(h) A business or establishment that fails to comply with the requirements of this section is liable for a civil penalty of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for a first offense and two thousand dollars
 ($2,000)
 for each subsequent offense. A government entity identified in Section 17204 of the Business and Professions Code may bring an action to impose a civil penalty pursuant to this subdivision against a business or establishment if a local or state agency with authority to regulate that business or establishment has satisfied both of the following:

(1) Provided the business or establishment with reasonable notice of noncompliance, which informs the business or establishment that it is subject to a civil penalty if it does not correct the violation within 30 days from the date the notice is sent to the business or establishment.

(2) Verified that the violation was not corrected within the 30-day period described in paragraph (1).

(i) This section does not prevent a local governing body from adopting and
 enforcing a local ordinance, rule, or regulation to prevent slavery or human trafficking. If a local ordinance, rule, or regulation duplicates or supplements the requirements that this section imposes upon businesses and other establishments, this section does not supersede or preempt that local ordinance, rule, or regulation.

(j) The Attorney General may enforce this section.

(k) Fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Survivors Support Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 82, Sec. 2.   (AB 379)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

52.65.

(a) A hotel is in violation of this section, and subject to civil penalties, if either or both of the following conditions are met:

(1) Sex trafficking activity occurred in the hotel, a supervisory employee of the hotel either knew of the nature of the activity, or acted in reckless disregard of the activity constituting sex trafficking activity within the hotel, and the supervisory employee of the hotel failed to inform law enforcement, the National Human Trafficking Hotline, or another appropriate victim service organization within 24 hours.

(2) An employee of the hotel was acting within the scope of employment and knowingly benefited, financially or by receiving anything of value, by participating
 in a venture that the employee knew or acted in reckless disregard of the activity constituting sex trafficking within the hotel.

(b) If there is reasonable cause to believe there has been a violation pursuant to subdivision (a), the Attorney General, a city, county, or city and county attorney may bring a civil action for injunctive and other equitable relief against a hotel for violation of this section. The Attorney General or a city, county, or city and county attorney who brings a civil action under this section may also seek civil penalties in the amount of
 three thousand dollars
 ($3,000) for the first violation, ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the second violation within a 24-month period of time, and fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for the third and any subsequent violation within
 a 24-month period.

(c) The court may exercise its discretion to increase the amount of the civil penalty, not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), for any fourth or subsequent violation, considering all of the following factors:

(1) The defendant’s culpability.

(2) The relationship between the harm and the penalty.

(3) The penalties imposed for similar conduct in similar statutes.

(4) The defendant’s ability to
 pay.

(d) The lack of reporting of a sex trafficking case that occurs in a hotel shall not, by itself, without meeting the conditions in either paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), result in the liability of an employer of that establishment to the sex trafficking victim or victims in the case in question or to any other party.

(e) No liability for civil penalties shall arise under this section against a hotel employee.

(f) Violation of this section, by itself, shall not result in criminal liability against the hotel.

(g) Nothing in this section affects criminal or civil liability that may arise pursuant to other provisions of law.

(h) For the purposes of this section, the following
 terms shall have the following definitions:

(1) “Hotel” means a motel, or any other operator or management company that offers and accepts payment for rooms, sleeping accommodations, or board and lodging and retains the right of access to, and control of, a dwelling unit that is required to provide training and education regarding human trafficking awareness pursuant to Section 12950.3 of the Government Code.

(2) “Sex trafficking” means human trafficking for the purposes of engaging in a commercial sex act as set forth in subdivision (c) of Section 236.1 of the Penal Code.

(3) “Supervisory employee” means any individual, regardless of the job description or title, who has each of the following capabilities and qualifications:

(A) Holds authority, in the
 interest of the employer, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward, or discipline other employees, or responsibility to direct them, or to adjust their grievances, or effectively to recommend this action, if, in connection with the foregoing, the exercise of this authority is not of a merely routine or clerical nature, but requires the use of independent judgment.

(B) Holds responsibility for duties that are not substantially similar to those of their subordinates. Employees whose duties are substantially similar to those of their subordinates shall not be considered to be supervisory employees.

(i) An action brought pursuant to this section shall be commenced within five years of the date when the violation of subdivision (a) occurred, or, if the victim of that sex trafficking activity was a minor when the violation occurred, within five
 years of the date the victim attains the age of majority.

(j) Fines collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Survivors Support Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 82, Sec. 3.   (AB 379)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

52.66.

(a) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Entertainment facility” means a publicly or privately owned place of entertainment with a capacity of over 15,000 people, including, but not limited to, an arena, auditorium, concert hall, live performance venue, museum, racetrack, stadium, theater, or other place where entertainment events are presented for a price of admission. The
 facility does not have to be used exclusively for entertainment events. The term does not apply to an amusement park or fairground.

(2) “Primary ticket seller” means a primary contractor as defined in Section 22503.5 of the Business and Professions Code, ticket seller, or agent of the primary contractor or ticket seller that engages in the primary sale of tickets for an event.

(b) Upon the purchase of a mobile or electronic ticket for an event at an entertainment facility, the primary ticket seller shall include the following notice with the ticket purchase confirmation electronically to the buyer:

“If you or someone you know is being forced to engage in commercial sex or labor trafficking, text 233-733 (Be Free) or call the National Human Trafficking Hotline at 1-888-373-7888 or the California Coalition to Abolish Slavery and Trafficking
 (CAST) at 1-888-KEY-2-FRE(EDOM) or 1-888-539-2373 to access help and services.

It is a felony in California to knowingly engage in commercial trafficking and perpetrators of this offense shall be prosecuted under the law.” 

(c) The notice to be included pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be provided in English, Spanish, and in one other language that is the most widely spoken language in the county where the entertainment facility is located and for which translation is mandated by the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10301 et seq.), as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.   (AB 1966)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

52.7.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (g), a person shall not require, coerce, or compel any other individual to undergo the subcutaneous implanting of an identification device.

(b) (1) Any person who violates subdivision (a) may be assessed an initial civil penalty of no more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and no more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day the violation continues until the deficiency is corrected. That civil penalty may be assessed and recovered in a civil action
 brought in any court of competent jurisdiction. The court may also grant a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and litigation costs, including, but not limited to, expert witness fees and expenses as part of the costs.

(2) A person who is implanted with a subcutaneous identification device in violation of subdivision (a) may bring a civil action for actual damages, compensatory damages, punitive damages, injunctive relief, any combination of those, or any other appropriate relief.

(3) Additionally, punitive damages may also be awarded upon proof of the defendant’s malice, oppression, fraud, or duress in requiring, coercing, or compelling the plaintiff to undergo the subcutaneous implanting of an identification device.

(c) (1) An action brought pursuant to this section shall be
 commenced within three years of the date upon which the identification device was implanted.

(2) If the victim was a dependent adult or minor when the implantation occurred, actions brought pursuant to this section shall be commenced within three years after the date the plaintiff, or his or her guardian or parent, discovered or reasonably should have discovered the implant, or within eight years after the plaintiff attains the age of majority, whichever date occurs later.

(3) The statute of limitations shall not run against a dependent adult or minor plaintiff simply because a guardian ad litem has been appointed. A guardian ad litem’s failure to bring a plaintiff’s action within the applicable limitation period will not prejudice the plaintiff’s right to do so.

(4) A defendant is estopped to assert a defense of the
 statute of limitations when the expiration of the statute is due to conduct by the defendant inducing the plaintiff to delay the filing of the action, or due to threats made by the defendant causing duress upon the plaintiff.

(d) Any restitution paid by the defendant to the victim shall be credited against any judgment, award, or settlement obtained pursuant to this section. Any judgment, award, or settlement obtained pursuant to an action under this section shall be subject to the provisions of Section 13963 of the Government Code.

(e) The provisions of this section shall be liberally construed so as to protect privacy and bodily integrity.

(f) Actions brought pursuant to this section are independent of any other actions, remedies, or procedures that may be available to an aggrieved party pursuant to any other
 law.

(g) This section shall not in any way modify existing statutory or case law regarding the rights of parents or guardians, the rights of children or minors, or the rights of dependent adults.

(h) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Identification device” means any item, application, or product that is passively or actively capable of transmitting personal information, including, but not limited to, devices using radio frequency technology.

(2) “Person” means an individual, business association, partnership, limited partnership, corporation, limited liability company, trust, estate, cooperative association, or other entity.

(3) “Personal information” includes any of the following data
 elements to the extent they are used alone or in conjunction with any other information used to identify an individual:

(A) First or last name.

(B) Address.

(C) Telephone number.

(D) E-mail, Internet Protocol, or Web site address.

(E) Date of birth.

(F) Driver’s license number or California identification card number.

(G) Any unique personal identifier number contained or encoded on a driver’s license or identification card issued pursuant to Section 13000 of the Vehicle Code.

(H) Bank, credit
 card, or other financial institution account number.

(I) Any unique personal identifier contained or encoded on a health insurance, health benefit, or benefit card or record issued in conjunction with any government-supported aid program.

(J) Religion.

(K) Ethnicity or nationality.

(L) Photograph.

(M) Fingerprint or other biometric identifier.

(N) Social security number.

(O) Any unique personal identifier.

(4) “Require, coerce, or compel” includes physical violence, threat, intimidation,
 retaliation, the conditioning of any private or public benefit or care on consent to implantation, including employment, promotion, or other employment benefit, or by any means that causes a reasonable person of ordinary susceptibilities to acquiesce to implantation when he or she otherwise would not.

(5) “Subcutaneous” means existing, performed, or introduced under or on the skin.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 538, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

52.8.

(a) In a civil action seeking damages or equitable relief against any person or entity that distributes, benefits from, promotes, or induces another person to distribute unauthorized obscene materials, including through electronic distribution, a prevailing plaintiff shall be awarded attorney’s fees and costs.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Obscene
 material” means material, taken as a whole, that to the average person, applying contemporary statewide standards, appeals to the prurient interest, that, taken as a whole, depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive way, and that, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value. 

(2) “Unauthorized” means either of the following:

(A) The obscene material was coerced, made, or obtained by trickery or subterfuge, or stolen, made, obtained, or distributed without the knowledge or without or beyond the express permission, freely given, of the person in the photograph, or the person whose identifiable likeness appears in the photograph.

(B) The obscene material is of a person who was less than 18 years of age at the time the obscene material was created.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 26, Sec. 1.   (SB 1210)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

53.

(a) Every provision in a written instrument relating to real property that purports to forbid or restrict the conveyance, encumbrance, leasing, or mortgaging of that real property to any person because of any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 is void, and every restriction or prohibition as to the use or occupation of real property because of any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 is void.

(b) Every restriction or prohibition, whether by way of
 covenant, condition upon use or occupation, or upon transfer of title to real property, which restriction or prohibition directly or indirectly limits the acquisition, use or occupation of that property because of any characteristic listed or defined in subdivision (b) or (e) of Section 51 is void.

(c) In any action to declare that a restriction or prohibition specified in subdivision (a) or (b) is void, the court shall take judicial notice of the recorded instrument or instruments containing the prohibitions or restrictions in the same manner that it takes judicial notice of the matters listed in Section 452 of the Evidence Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 420, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

53.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, except as specified in this section, an innkeeper, hotelkeeper, motelkeeper, lodginghouse keeper, or owner or operator of an inn, hotel, motel, lodginghouse, or other similar accommodations, or any employee or agent thereof, who offers or accepts payment for rooms, sleeping accommodations, or board and lodging, or other similar accommodation, shall not disclose, produce, provide, release,
 transfer, disseminate, or otherwise communicate, except to a California peace officer, all or any part of a guest record orally, in writing, or by electronic or any other means to a third party without a court-issued subpoena, warrant, or order.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, except as specified in this section, an owner or operator of a private or charter bus transportation company, or any employee or agent thereof, shall not disclose, produce, provide, release, transfer, disseminate, or otherwise communicate, except to a California peace officer, all or any part of a passenger manifest record orally, in writing, or by electronic or any other means to a third party without a court-issued subpoena, warrant, or order.

(c) “Guest record” for purposes of this section includes any record that identifies an individual guest, boarder, occupant, lodger, customer, or invitee,
 including, but not limited to, their name, social security number or other unique identifying number, date of birth, location of birth, address, telephone number, driver’s license number, other official form of identification, credit card number, or automobile license plate number.

(d) “Passenger manifest record” for purposes of this section includes any record that identifies an individual guest, passenger, customer, or invitee, including, but not limited to, their name, social security number or other unique identifying number, date of birth, location of birth, address, telephone number, driver’s license number, other official form of identification, credit card number, or automobile license plate number.

(e) “Court issued subpoena, warrant, or order” for purposes of this section is limited to subpoenas, warrants, or orders issued by a judicial officer. An administrative
 subpoena, warrant, or order is not sufficient for purposes of this section.

(f) “Third-party service provider,” for the purposes of this section, means an entity contracted to provide services outlined in the contract that has no independent right to use or share the data beyond the terms of the contract. Records shared with a third-party service provider shall be subject to limitations on further disclosure as described in subdivisions (a) and (b), except as otherwise permitted by this section.

(g) This section shall not be construed to prevent a government entity from requiring a private business to provide business records, including, but not limited to, guest and passenger manifest records, in a public health, civil rights, or consumer protection investigation, or in an investigation conducted pursuant to Section 308.5 of the Public Utilities Code.

(h) This section shall not be construed to prevent a government entity from requiring a private business to provide business records during an audit or inspection if those records omit the personal information described in subdivisions (c) and (d).

(i) This section shall not be construed to prevent a private business from providing business records containing a guest’s or passenger’s name, address, credit card number, or driver’s license number to a third-party service provider, if required, for the sole purpose of effectuating financial payment, including, approving or processing negotiable instruments, electronic fund transfers, or similar methods of payment, from a guest or passenger to the private business for a good or service, or from providing business records to a third-party service provider that the private business contracts with for business-related services.

(j) This section shall not be construed to prevent a private business from providing, where required, business records to a government entity in order to comply with state and federal laws regarding financial oversight and privacy, including, but not limited to, the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 6801). Records shared with a government entity or in compliance with the federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act shall be subject to the limitations on further disclosure as described in subdivisions (a) and (b), except as otherwise permitted by this section.

(k) This section shall not be construed to prevent a private business from disclosing records in a criminal investigation if a law enforcement officer in good faith believes that an emergency involving imminent danger of death or serious bodily injury to a person requires a warrantless search, to the extent permitted by law.

(l) This section shall not be construed to compel disclosure of a guest record or passenger manifest record by an innkeeper, motelkeeper, lodginghouse keeper, or owner or operator of an inn, hotel, motel, lodginghouse, or other similar accommodation, or an owner or operator of a private or charter bus transportation company, in the absence of a court-issued subpoena, warrant, or order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 23.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

53.7.

(a) A statute, ordinance, or other state or local rule, regulation, or enactment shall not deny a minority group political structure equal protection of the law by altering, restructuring, or reordering the policy decisionmaking process in a manner that burdens the ability of members of the minority group to effect the enactment of future legislation, solely with respect to a matter that inures primarily to the benefit of, or is primarily of interest to, one or more
 minority groups.

(b) (1) A member of a minority group, as defined in paragraph (2), may bring a civil action challenging the validity of a statute, ordinance, or other state or local rule, regulation, or enactment, pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) For purposes of this section, “minority group” means a group of persons who share in common any race, ethnicity, nationality, or sexual orientation.

(c) A statute, ordinance, or other state or local rule, regulation, or enactment shall be determined valid in an action brought pursuant to this section, only upon a showing by the government that the burden imposed by the statute, ordinance, or other state or local rule, regulation, or enactment satisfies both of the following criteria:

(1) The burden is necessary to serve a compelling government interest.

(2) The burden is no greater than necessary to serve the compelling government interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 912, Sec. 2.   (AB 2646)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

53.8.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the No Kings Act.

(b) Every natural person who, under color of any law, statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage, subjects, or causes to be subjected, any citizen of this state or any person within the jurisdiction thereof to the deprivation of any rights, privileges, or immunities secured by the United States Constitution, shall be liable to the party injured in an action at law, suit in equity, or other proper proceeding for redress, except that in any action brought against a judicial officer for an act or omission taken in the officer’s judicial capacity, injunctive relief shall not be granted unless a
 declaratory decree was violated or declaratory relief was unavailable.

(c) (1) A defendant in an action brought under subdivision (b) may assert, and shall receive the benefit of, a defense of absolute or qualified immunity only to the same extent as a person sued under Section 1983 of Title 42 of the United States Code under like circumstances.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to make a defense described in this subdivision broader or narrower than that defense would be if asserted under like circumstances in an action under Section 1983 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(3) This subdivision applies only to proceedings brought under subdivision (b), and does not
 alter, amend, create, or support a qualified or absolute immunity defense, or any rule or decision governing such a defense, in any other action or proceeding brought under any other provision of California law.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to waive or abrogate any defense of sovereign immunity otherwise available to a party. This subdivision applies only to proceedings brought under subdivision (b), and does not alter, amend, create, or support a sovereign immunity defense in any other action or proceeding brought under any other provision of California law.

(e) In any action or proceeding brought under this section, the court, in its discretion, may award a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, except that in any action brought against a judicial officer for an act or omission taken in the officer’s judicial capacity, the officer shall not be held liable for any fees or costs, except if the officer’s action was clearly in excess of the officer’s jurisdiction.

(f) A civil action brought under subdivision (b) shall not be commenced later than two years after the date that the cause of action accrues.

(g) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(h) (1) This section shall apply retroactively to March 1, 2025, provided that, for any claim for a violation of the United States Constitution that occurred between March 1, 2025, and the effective date of this section, the only monetary damages that shall be available pursuant to this section for that constitutional violation are nominal and compensatory damages.

(2) (A) An action shall not be brought under this
 section by or on behalf of an injured party if, before the effective date of this section, a court of competent jurisdiction entered a final judgment on the merits determining either of the following:

(i) Whether the conduct complained of deprived that party of rights, privileges, or immunities secured by the United States Constitution.

(ii) The person whose conduct is complained of did not violate clearly established constitutional rights of which a reasonable person would have known at the time of the conduct complained of.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, a judgment is not a judgment on the merits if it rested on the absence or unavailability of a cause of action or remedy for the alleged deprivation, rather than on a determination described in clause (i) or (ii) of subparagraph (A).

(3) Paragraph (2) supplements, and does not limit or displace, any otherwise applicable law governing claim or issue preclusion.

(i) For purposes of this section, both of the following definitions apply:

(1) “Color of any law, statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage” includes color of any statute, ordinance, regulation, custom, or usage, of the United States and of any state or territory or the District of Columbia.

(2)   “Natural person” does not include a federal, state, or local official who is sued in their official capacity for monetary relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   (SB 747)   Effective September 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

53.9.

(a) All persons housed or detained for purposes of civil immigration proceedings in California at any state, county, local, or private locked detention facility, including any county, local, or private locked detention facility in which an individual is housed or detained on behalf of, or pursuant to a contract with, the federal Office of Refugee Resettlement or the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, have the legal rights and responsibilities guaranteed all other persons by the United States Constitution and federal law and the California Constitution and state law, unless specifically limited by federal or state law or regulations.

(b) All persons housed or detained for purposes of civil immigration proceedings in California at any state, county, local, or private locked detention facility, including any county, local, or private locked detention facility in which an individual is housed or detained on behalf of, or pursuant to a contract with, the federal Office of Refugee Resettlement or the United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement, have the following rights:

(1) A right to dignity, privacy, and humane
 care.

(2) A right to mental health treatment services provided in ways that are the least restrictive of the personal liberty of the individual.

(3) A right to medical and dental care and treatment.

(4) A right to be free from harm, including abuse or neglect, and unnecessary
 or excessive physical restraint, isolation,
 or medication.

(5) A right to religious freedom and practice, physical exercise, and recreational opportunities.

(6) A right to clean drinking water and functioning toilet and shower
 facilities.

(7) A right to a clean facility and living quarters that is kept in good repair.

(8) A right to food that is adequate to maintain health and is selected, stored, prepared, and served in a safe and healthful manner.

(9) A right, subject to denial for good cause as described in subdivisions (c) to (e), inclusive, of Section 884 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations, to all of the following:

(A) Reasonable access to a telephone, both to make and receive confidential calls, provided that telephone hours, frequency and duration of telephone calls, and method of payment may be limited to ensure access by all.

(B) Reasonable access to letter writing materials.

(C) The ability to send and receive correspondence, subject to inspection for contraband and subject to limitations on size, weight, and volume of mail as specified by formal facility policy. Letters or documents sent to or received from an attorney, court, or government official through the mail shall not
 be read by anyone other than the addressee.

(c) The Legislature reaffirms that persons protected by the rights described in Sections 4502, 4503, 5325, and 5325.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and Sections 883 and 884 of Title 9 of the California Code of Regulations have all of the following rights:

(1) A right to mental health and dental care and treatment.

(2) A right to clean drinking water and functioning toilet and shower facilities.

(3) A right to a clean facility and living quarters that is kept in good repair.

(4) A right to food that is adequate to maintain health and
 is selected, stored, prepared, and served in a safe and healthful manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 755, Sec. 3.   (SB 942)   Effective September 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2.5. BLIND AND OTHER PHYSICALLY DISABLED PERSONS [54. - 55.32.]

54.

(a) Individuals with disabilities or medical conditions have the same right as the general public to the full and free use of the streets, highways, sidewalks, walkways, public buildings, medical facilities, including hospitals, clinics, and physicians’ offices, public facilities, and other public places.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Disability” means any mental or physical disability as defined in Section
 12926 of the Government Code.

(2) “Medical condition” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 12926 of the Government Code.

(c) A violation of the right of an individual under the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336) also constitutes a violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1049, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

54.1.

(a) (1) Individuals with disabilities shall be entitled to full and equal access, as other members of the general public, to accommodations, advantages, facilities, medical facilities, including hospitals, clinics, and physicians’ offices, and privileges of all common carriers, airplanes, motor vehicles, railroad trains, motorbuses, streetcars, boats, or any other public conveyances or
 modes of transportation (whether private, public, franchised, licensed, contracted, or otherwise provided), telephone facilities, adoption agencies, private schools, hotels, lodging places, places of public accommodation, amusement, or resort, and other places to which the general public is invited, subject only to the conditions and limitations established by law, or state or federal regulation, and applicable alike to all persons.

(2) As used in this section, “telephone facilities” means tariff items and other equipment and services that have been approved by the Public Utilities Commission to be used by individuals with disabilities in a manner feasible and compatible with the existing telephone network provided by the telephone companies.

(3) “Full and equal access,” for purposes of this section in its application to transportation, means access that meets the standards of
 Titles II and III of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law 101-336) and federal regulations adopted pursuant thereto, except that, if the laws of this state prescribe higher standards, it shall mean access that meets those higher standards.

(b) (1) Individuals with disabilities shall be entitled to full and equal access, as other members of the general public, to all housing accommodations offered for rent, lease, or compensation in this state, subject to the conditions and limitations established by law, or state or federal regulation, and applicable alike to all persons.

(2) “Housing accommodations” means any real property, or portion of real property, that is used or occupied, or is intended, arranged, or designed to be used or occupied, as the home, residence, or sleeping place of one or more human beings, but shall not include any
 accommodations included within subdivision (a) or any single-family residence the occupants of which rent, lease, or furnish for compensation not more than one room in the residence.

(3) (A) A person renting, leasing, or otherwise providing real property for compensation shall not refuse to permit an individual with a disability, at that person’s expense, to make reasonable modifications of the existing rented premises if the modifications are necessary to afford the person full enjoyment of the premises. However, any modifications under this paragraph may be conditioned on the disabled tenant entering into an agreement to restore the interior of the premises to the condition existing before the modifications. No additional security may be required on account of an election to make modifications to the rented premises under this paragraph, but the lessor and tenant may negotiate, as part of the agreement to restore the
 premises, a provision requiring the disabled tenant to pay an amount into an escrow account, not to exceed a reasonable estimate of the cost of restoring the premises.

(B) A person renting, leasing, or otherwise providing real property for compensation shall not refuse to make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies, practices, or services, when those accommodations may be necessary to afford individuals with a disability equal opportunity to use and enjoy the premises.

(4) This subdivision does not require a person renting, leasing, or providing for compensation real property to modify his or her property in any way or provide a higher degree of care for an individual with a disability than for an individual who is not disabled.

(5) Except as provided in paragraph (6), this part does not require a person
 renting, leasing, or providing for compensation real property, if that person refuses to accept tenants who have dogs, to accept as a tenant an individual with a disability who has a dog.

(6) (A) It shall be deemed a denial of equal access to housing accommodations within the meaning of this subdivision for a person, firm, or corporation to refuse to lease or rent housing accommodations to an individual who is blind or visually impaired on the basis that the individual uses the services of a guide dog, an individual who is deaf or hard of hearing on the basis that the individual uses the services of a signal dog, or to an individual with any other disability on the basis that the individual uses the services of a service dog, or to refuse to permit such an individual who is blind or visually impaired to keep a guide dog, an individual who is deaf or hard of hearing to keep a signal dog, or an individual with any other
 disability to keep a service dog on the premises.

(B) Except in the normal performance of duty as a mobility or signal aid, this paragraph does not prevent the owner of a housing accommodation from establishing terms in a lease or rental agreement that reasonably regulate the presence of guide dogs, signal dogs, or service dogs on the premises of a housing accommodation, nor does this paragraph relieve a tenant from any liability otherwise imposed by law for real and personal property damages caused by such a dog when proof of the damage exists.

(C) (i) As used in this subdivision, “guide dog” means a guide dog that was trained by a person licensed under Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 7200) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code or as defined in the regulations implementing Title III of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (Public Law
 101-336).

(ii) As used in this subdivision, “signal dog” means a dog trained to alert an individual who is deaf or hard of hearing to intruders or sounds.

(iii) As used in this subdivision, “service dog” means a dog individually trained to the requirements of the individual with a disability, including, but not limited to, minimal protection work, rescue work, pulling a wheelchair, or fetching dropped items.

(7) It shall be deemed a denial of equal access to housing accommodations within the meaning of this subdivision for a person, firm, or corporation to refuse to lease or rent housing accommodations to an individual who is blind or visually impaired, an individual who is deaf or hard of hearing, or other individual with a disability on the basis that the individual with a disability is partially or wholly
 dependent upon the income of his or her spouse, if the spouse is a party to the lease or rental agreement. This subdivision does not prohibit a lessor or landlord from considering the aggregate financial status of an individual with a disability and his or her spouse.
